Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 81 SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS EDUCATION, PREVENTION, AND TREATMENT
27-81-112. Involuntary commitment of a person with a substance use disorder.

The court may commit a person to the custody of the BHA upon the petition of the person's spouse or guardian, a relative, a physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, the administrator in charge of an approved treatment facility, a certified peace officer, or any other responsible person. The petition must allege that the person has a substance use disorder and that the person has threatened or attempted to inflict or inflicted physical harm on the person's self or on another and that unless committed, the person is likely to inflict physical harm on the person's self or on another or that the person is incapacitated by substances. A refusal to undergo treatment does not constitute evidence of lack of judgment as to the need for treatment. The petition must be accompanied by a certificate of a licensed physician who has examined the person within ten days before submission of the petition, unless the person whose commitment is sought has refused to submit to a medical examination, in which case the fact of refusal must be alleged in the petition, or an examination cannot be made of the person due to the person's condition. The certificate must set forth the physician's findings in support of the petition's allegations.

A court shall not accept a petition submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section unless there is documentation of the refusal by the person to be committed to accessible and affordable voluntary treatment. The documentation may include, but is not limited to, notations in the person's medical or law enforcement records or statements by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or witness.

Upon filing the petition, the person whose commitment is sought must be notified of the person's right to:

Enter into a stipulated order of the court for committed treatment in order to expedite placement in an approved treatment facility by the BHA; or

Contest the commitment proceeding.

If a stipulated order is entered, the BHA shall place the person in an approved treatment program that reflects the level of need of the person.

If the person whose commitment is sought exercises the right to contest the petition, the court shall fix a date for a hearing no later than ten days, excluding weekends and holidays, after the date the petition was filed. A copy of the petition and the notice of the hearing, including the date fixed by the court, must be personally served on the petitioner, the person whose commitment is sought, and one of the person's parents or the person's legal guardian if the person is a minor. A copy of the petition and notice of hearing must be provided to the BHA, to counsel for the person whose commitment is sought, to the administrator in charge of the approved treatment facility to which the person may have been committed for emergency treatment, and to any other person the court believes advisable.

At the hearing, the court shall hear all relevant testimony, including, if possible, the testimony of at least one licensed physician who has examined the person whose commitment is sought. The person must be present unless the court believes that the person's presence is likely to be injurious to the person; in this event, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the person throughout the proceeding. If the person has refused to be examined by a licensed physician, the person must be given an opportunity to be examined by a court-appointed licensed physician. If the person refuses and there is sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations of the petition are true or if the court believes that more medical evidence is necessary, the court may commit the person to a licensed hospital for a period of not more than five days for a diagnostic examination. In such event, the court shall schedule a further hearing for final determination of commitment, in no event later than five days after the first hearing.

If after hearing all relevant evidence, including the results of any diagnostic examination by the licensed hospital, the court finds that grounds for involuntary commitment have been established by clear and convincing proof, the court shall make an order of commitment to the BHA. The BHA has the right to delegate physical custody of the person to an appropriate approved treatment facility. The court may not order commitment of a person unless the court determines that the BHA is able to provide adequate and appropriate treatment for the person, and the treatment is likely to be beneficial.

Upon the court's commitment of a person to the BHA, the court may issue an order to the sheriff to transport the person to the facility designated by the BHA.

A person committed as provided for in this section remains in the custody of the BHA for treatment for a period of up to ninety days. At the end of the ninety-day period, the treatment facility shall automatically discharge the person unless the BHA, before expiration of the ninety-day period, obtains a court order for the person's recommitment on the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section for a further period of ninety days unless discharged sooner. If a person has been committed because the person is a person with a substance use disorder who is likely to inflict physical harm on another, the BHA shall apply for recommitment if, after examination, it is determined that the likelihood to inflict physical harm on another still exists.

A person who is recommitted as provided for in subsection (7) of this section and who has not been discharged by the BHA before the end of the ninety-day period is discharged at the expiration of that ninety-day period unless the BHA, before expiration of the ninety-day period, obtains a court order on the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section for recommitment for a further period, not to exceed ninety days. If a person has been committed because the person is a person with a substance use disorder who is likely to inflict physical harm on another, the BHA shall apply for recommitment if, after examination, it is determined that the likelihood to inflict physical harm on another still exists. Only two recommitment orders pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and this subsection (8) are permitted.

Upon the filing of a petition for recommitment under subsections (7) and (8) of this section, the court shall fix a date for hearing not later than ten days, excluding weekends and holidays, after the date the petition was filed unless a valid medical reason exists for delaying the hearing. A copy of the petition and of the notice of hearing shall be served and provided as required in subsection (3) of this section. At the hearing, the court shall proceed as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

The BHA shall provide adequate and appropriate treatment of a person committed to its custody. The BHA may transfer any person committed to its custody from one approved treatment facility to another, if transfer is advisable.

The BHA shall discharge a person committed to its custody for treatment at any time before the end of the period for which the person has been committed if either of the following conditions is met:

In the case of a person with a substance use disorder committed on the grounds that the person is likely to inflict physical harm upon another, that the person no longer has a substance use disorder that requires treatment or the likelihood to inflict physical harm upon another no longer exists; or

In the case of a person with a substance use disorder committed on the grounds of the need of treatment and incapacity, that the incapacity no longer exists, or in the case of a person with a substance use disorder committed on any grounds pursuant to this section, that further treatment is not likely to bring about significant improvement in the person's condition, or treatment is no longer appropriate, or that further treatment is unlikely to be beneficial.

The court shall inform the person whose commitment or recommitment is sought of the person's right to contest the application, to be represented by counsel at every stage of any proceedings relating to the person's commitment and recommitment, and to have counsel appointed by the court or provided by the court if the person wants the assistance of counsel and is unable to obtain counsel. If the court believes that the person needs the assistance of counsel, the court shall require, by appointment if necessary, counsel for the person regardless of the person's wishes. The person whose commitment or recommitment is sought shall be informed of the person's right to be examined by a licensed physician of the person's choice. If the person is unable to obtain a licensed physician and requests examination by a physician, the court shall employ a licensed physician.

If a private treatment facility agrees with the request of a competent patient or the patient's parent, sibling, adult child, or guardian to accept the patient for treatment, the administrator of the public treatment facility shall transfer the patient to the private treatment facility.

A person committed under this article 81 may at any time seek to be discharged from commitment by an order in the nature of habeas corpus.

The venue for proceedings under this section is the county in which the person to be committed resides or is present.

All proceedings conducted pursuant to this article 81 are conducted by the district attorney of the county where the proceeding is held or by an attorney acting for the district attorney appointed by the court for that purpose; except that, in any county or in any city and county having a population exceeding one hundred thousand persons, the proceedings shall be conducted by the county attorney or by an attorney acting for the county attorney appointed by the court.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 741, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1), (3), (5), (6), (7), (8), (10), and (11) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1368, § 279, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1401, § 21, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1672, § 54, effective July 1; (1), (3)(a)(I), (3)(b), (3)(c), (5), (6), (7), (8), (10), and IP(11) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1572, § 186, effective July 1.

27-81-113. Records of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of substances.

The registration and other records of treatment facilities are confidential and fully protected as outlined in federal confidentiality regulations for substance use disorder records found at 42 CFR part 2, as amended, and are privileged to the patient.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner may make available information from patients' records for purposes of research into the causes and treatment of substance use disorders. Information made available pursuant to this subsection (2) must not be published in a way that discloses patients' names or other identifying information.

Nothing in this section prohibits or limits the sharing of information by a state institution of higher education police department to authorized university administrators pursuant to section 23-5-141.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 743, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2011:

(3) added, (HB 11-1169), ch. 119, p. 374, § 4, effective April 20.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1370, § 280, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1404, § 22, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1573, § 187, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-312 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-81-114. Rights of persons receiving evaluation, care, or treatment.

A facility shall immediately advise each person receiving evaluation, care, or treatment under any provision of this article 81, orally and in writing, that the person has and is afforded the following rights:

To be evaluated to determine the person's behavioral health treatment needs relating to the use of substances, including alcohol or drugs;

If under an emergency commitment pursuant to section 27-81-111, to refuse to be examined by a licensed physician for certification. A person's refusal to be examined for certification may be alleged in a petition for involuntary commitment. A person may request to be examined by the person's physician, or a court may order a person to be evaluated by a licensed physician for certification.

To receive timely medical and behavioral health care and treatment, as specified in law, that is determined based on the person's needs and that is delivered in the least restrictive treatment setting possible, as set forth in BHA rules;

To be treated fairly and to receive the same consideration and access to appropriate services as others, regardless of race, color, national origin, age, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, political affiliation, religious beliefs, financial status, or disability;

To contest a commitment proceeding or to enter into a stipulated order of the court for committed treatment;

To retain and consult with an attorney at any time and to have an attorney appointed by or provided by the court in a timely manner in any proceedings relating to commitment or recommitment if the person wants the assistance of an attorney and is unable to obtain an attorney;

To at any time seek to be discharged from commitment by an order in the nature of habeas corpus;

Once no longer under the influence of drugs or intoxicated by alcohol, to sign in and seek voluntary substance use disorder treatment, unless the administrator determines in writing that reasonable grounds exist to believe that the person will not remain in voluntary treatment or that the person is clearly dangerous to the health and safety of himself or herself or others;

If in committed treatment, to receive twenty-four-hour notice prior to being transferred to another facility;

To have reasonable opportunities for continuing visitation and communication with the person's family and friends, consistent with an effective treatment program and as determined in BHA rules. Each person may meet with the person's attorney, clergyperson, or health-care provider at any time.

To have reasonable access to mail and writing materials, including postage, as well as the assistance of facility staff if the person is unable to write, prepare, or mail correspondence;

Subject to BHA rules relating to the use of telephones and other communication devices, to have reasonable access to telephones or other communication devices, and to make and to receive calls or communications in privacy. Facility staff shall not open, delay, intercept, read, or censor mail or other communications or use mail or other communications as a method to enforce compliance with facility staff.

To wear his or her own clothes, keep and use personal possessions, and keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of the person's own money;

To have access to medical records;

To have treatment records remain confidential, except as required by law;

To not be fingerprinted, unless required by law;

To refuse to be photographed, except for treatment facility identification purposes;

To have the opportunity to register and vote by absentee ballot with the assistance of facility staff;

To have appropriate access to adequate food, water, and hygiene products;

To have physical privacy in showering, changing, and using the restroom; and

To be free of restraints and solitary confinement.

Only qualified staff providing evaluation, treatment, or care for a person may deny or restrict the person's rights under subsection (1) of this section if the person's health or safety would be clearly endangered if the rights were not denied or restricted. If a person's rights are denied or restricted, the reason for the denial or restriction must be explained to the person and entered into the person's treatment record. The facility shall provide the person and the person's attorney the information pertaining to a denial or restriction of rights contained in the person's treatment record. The person's rights must be immediately restored as soon as the person's health and safety are no longer clearly endangered.

A person receiving evaluation, care, or treatment under any provision of this article 81 may submit a grievance or complaint against the facility or facility staff pursuant to a grievance or complaint process, which is explained to the person in detail and included with the oral and written explanation of rights.

As part of the immediate oral and written advisement of the rights enumerated in this section, a facility shall also include the telephone number and e-mail address for the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care, created in section 27-80-303. The written advisements must be translated if the person cannot read or understand English. The administrator shall cause the rights enumerated in this section to be posted in a prominent location where clients in the facility reside, which posting must also include the number and e-mail address for the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care, created in section 27-80-303.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 743, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2020:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1404, § 23, effective July 13.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 897, § 43, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(c), (1)(j), and (1)(l) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1574, § 188, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-313 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-81-115. Emergency service patrol - establishment - rules.

The BHA and cities, counties, city and counties, and regional service authorities may establish emergency service patrols. A patrol consists of persons trained to give assistance in the streets and in other public places to persons who are intoxicated by alcohol, under the influence of drugs, or incapacitated by substances. Members of an emergency service patrol must be capable of providing first aid in emergency situations and are authorized to transport a person intoxicated by alcohol, under the influence of drugs, or incapacitated by substances to the person's home and to and from treatment facilities.

The commissioner shall adopt rules for the establishment, training, and conduct of emergency service patrols.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 744, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1370, § 281, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1407, § 24, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1574, § 189, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-314 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-81-116. Payment for treatment - financial ability of patients.

If treatment is provided by an approved public treatment facility and the patient, including a committed person, has not paid the charge therefor, the approved treatment facility is entitled to any payment received by the patient or to which the patient may be entitled because of the services rendered and from any public or private source available to the approved treatment facility because of the treatment provided to the patient. The approved treatment facility may seek and obtain a judgment in an appropriate court for any fees or charges that have not been paid.

A patient in an approved treatment facility, or the estate of the patient, or a person obligated to provide for the cost of treatment and having sufficient financial ability is liable to the approved treatment facility for the cost of maintenance and treatment of the patient therein in accordance with rates established. The approved treatment facility may seek and obtain a judgment in an appropriate court for any fees or charges that have not been paid.

The commissioner shall adopt rules that establish a standardized ability-to-pay schedule, under which those with sufficient financial ability are required to pay the full cost of services provided and those who are totally without sufficient financial ability are provided appropriate treatment at no charge. The schedule shall take into consideration the income, including government assistance programs, savings, and other personal and real property, of the person required to pay and any support the person required to pay furnishes to another person as required by law.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit an approved treatment facility from charging a minimal fee for therapeutic purposes.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 744, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1574, § 190, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-315 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-81-117. Criminal laws - limitations.

A county, municipality, or other political subdivision may not adopt or enforce a local law, ordinance, resolution, or rule having the force of law that includes drinking, being a person with an alcohol use disorder, or being found in an intoxicated condition as one of the elements of the offense giving rise to a criminal or civil penalty or sanction.

A county, municipality, or other political subdivision shall not interpret or apply any law of general application to circumvent the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Nothing in this article 81 affects any law, ordinance, resolution, or rule against drunken driving, driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or other similar offense involving the operation of a vehicle, an aircraft, or a boat or machinery or other equipment or regarding the sale, purchase, dispensing, possessing, or use of drugs or alcoholic beverages at stated times and places or by a particular class of persons.

The fact that a person is intoxicated by alcohol, under the influence of drugs, or incapacitated by substances does not prevent the person's arrest or prosecution for the commission of any criminal act or conduct not enumerated in subsection (1) of this section.

Nothing in this article 81 limits the right of a police officer to make an otherwise legal arrest, notwithstanding the fact that the arrested person may be intoxicated by alcohol, under the influence of drugs, or incapacitated by substances.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 744, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1370, § 282, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1407, § 25, effective July 13.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-316 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-81-118. Opioid crisis recovery funds advisory committee - creation - membership - purpose.

There is created the opioid crisis recovery funds advisory committee, referred to in this section as the "committee", which is created to advise and collaborate with the department of law on uses of any custodial funds received by the state as the result of opioid-addiction-related litigation and for which the use of the funds is not predetermined or committed by court order or other action by a state or federal court of law.

The committee consists of members appointed as follows:

Thirteen members appointed by the governor, including:

One member licensed to practice medicine pursuant to article 240 of title 12;

One member licensed to practice pharmacy pursuant to article 280 of title 12;

One member licensed to practice as a nurse pursuant to part 1 of article 255 of title 12;

One member licensed as a dentist pursuant to article 220 of title 12;

One member licensed as a veterinarian pursuant to article 315 of title 12;

One member licensed as a physical therapist pursuant to article 285 of title 12;

One member representing a local public health agency;

One member who has been affected by the opioid crisis;

One family member of a person who has been affected by the opioid crisis;

One member representing an advocacy organization for people with substance use disorders;

Two members appointed from nominees submitted by statewide organizations representing counties, with one member representing the western slope and one member representing the eastern part of the state; and

One member from an association that represents behavioral health providers;

Two members appointed by the commissioner, one of whom must represent an association of substance use providers;

Two members appointed by the executive director of the department of public health and environment, one of whom is a pain management patient;

One member appointed by the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies;

One member appointed by the executive director of the department of health care policy and financing;

One member from the state substance abuse trend and response task force, created in section 18-18.5-103, appointed by the attorney general;

One member from the center for research into substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies, created in section 27-80-118 (3), appointed by the director of the center;

One member from each safety net hospital that provides addiction services, appointed by the hospital;

One member from the Colorado district attorneys' council, or any successor organization, appointed by its executive director;

Two members representing law enforcement agencies, one of whom is appointed by the Colorado association of chiefs of police, or any successor organization, and one of whom is appointed by the county sheriffs of Colorado, or any successor organization; and

One member representing the Colorado municipal league, or any successor organization, appointed by the president of the executive board of the Colorado municipal league or the president's designee.

The attorney general shall notify the appointing authorities if the state receives a settlement or damage award for which the use of the custodial funds is not predetermined or committed by court order or other action by a state or federal court of law. The appointing authorities shall make their initial appointments to the committee no later than ninety days after receiving the notice.

Each member of the committee who is appointed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority that appointed the member. The appointing authority shall fill a vacancy in the same manner as the initial appointment.

If the state receives custodial funds from a settlement or damage award from opioid-addiction-related litigation and the use of the funds is not predetermined or committed by court order or other action by a state or federal court of law, the attorney general shall convene and call a meeting of the committee, and any subsequent meetings as necessary, to seek input and recommendations from the committee on the proper expenditure of the funds received.

Each member of the committee shall maintain confidentiality throughout the process of determining the proper expenditure of custodial funds. Members shall not disclose the contents of any requests for funding with anyone outside of the committee.

Each committee member shall affirm that the member does not have a personal or financial interest regarding any organization that may request funding. Members shall disclose all potential conflict of interest situations to the attorney general before reviewing funding requests.

Source:

L. 2020:

(2)(a)(I)(C) amended, (HB 20-1183), ch. 157, p. 705, § 67, effective July 1; entire section added, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1407, § 26, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

(2)(a)(II) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1575, § 191, effective July 1.